sv: Driftlägen för timer: Uppräkning; Nedräkning; Intervall; Manuell åsidosättning; Enstaka körning (en utlösare); Förinställda program; Slumpmässig; Upprepad cykel; Soluppgång/solnedgång; Annat
es: Modos de funcionamiento del temporizador: Cuenta progresiva; Cuenta regresiva; Intervalo; Anulación manual; De un solo uso (un solo disparador); Programas preestablecidos; Aleatorio; Ciclo de repetición; Amanecer/atardecer; Otro
bg-BG: Режими на работа на таймера: Отброяване напред; Отброяване назад; Интервал; Ръчно заместване; Еднократно (единично задействане); Предварително зададени програми; Случаен; Повтарящ се цикъл; Изгрев/залез; Друго
nl: Timer-bedrijfsmodi: Optellen; Aftellen; Interval; Handmatige override; One-shot (enkele trigger); Voorgeprogrammeerde programma's; Willekeurig; Herhalingscyclus; Zonsopgang/-ondergang; Overige
fi: Ajastimen käyttötilat: Ajanotto ylöspäin; Lähtölaskenta; Intervalli; Manuaalinen ohitus; Kertatoiminen (yksittäinen käynnistin); Esiasetetut ohjelmat; Satunnainen; Toistuva sykli; Auringonnousu/-lasku; Muu
da: Driftstilstande for timer: Optælling; Nedtælling; Interval; Manuel tilsidesættelse; One-shot (enkelt udløser); Forudindstillede programmer; Tilfældig; Gentagelsescyklus; Solopgang/solnedgang; Andet
ko: 타이머 작동 모드: 카운트업; 카운트다운; 인터벌; 수동 재정의; 원샷(단일 트리거); 사전 설정 프로그램; 무작위; 반복 주기; 일출/일몰; 기타
zh-CN: 定时工作模式: 正计时; 倒计时; 间歇; 手动干预; 单次触发（单触发）; 预设程序; 随机; 循环重复; 日出/日落; 其他
nb: Bruksmoduser for tidtaker: Telle opp; Nedtelling; Intervall; Manuell overstyring; Engangs (enkel utløser); Forhåndsinnstilte programmer; Tilfeldig; Gjenta syklus; Soloppgang/solnedgang; Annet
pl: Tryby pracy timera: Odliczanie w górę; Odliczanie w dół; Interwał; Sterowanie ręczne; Jednorazowy (pojedynczy wyzwalacz); Wstępnie ustawione programy; Losowe; Powtarzanie cyklu; Wschód/zachód słońca; Inne
ja: タイマー操作モード: カウントアップ; カウントダウン; インターバル; 手動オーバーライド; ワンショット (シングルトリガー); プリセットプログラム; ランダム; 繰り返しサイクル; 日の出/日の入り; その他
pt-BR: Modos de operação do temporizador: Contagem progressiva; Contagem regressiva; Intervalo; Substituição manual; Disparo único (acionamento simples); Programas predefinidos; Aleatório; Ciclo de repetição; Nascer/pôr do sol; Outros
tr: Zamanlayıcı çalışma modları: İleri sayım; Geri sayım; Aralık; Manuel kontrol; Tek atımlık (tek tetikleyici); Ön ayarlı programlar; Rastgele; Tekrar döngüsü; Gündoğumu/günbatımı; Diğer
de: Betriebsmodi des Timers: Aufwärtszählend; Countdown; Intervall; Manuelle Übersteuerung; One-Shot (einzelner Trigger); Voreingestellte Programme; Zufällig; Wiederholzyklus; Sonnenaufgang/-untergang; Sonstige
en: Timer operating modes: Count-up; Countdown; Interval; Manual override; One-shot (single trigger); Preset programs; Random; Repeat cycle; Sunrise/sunset; Other
sk-SK: Režim prevádzky časovača: Odpočítavanie nahor; Odpočítavanie nadol; Interval; Manuálne prepísanie; Jednorazové (jeden spúšťač); Prednastavené programy; Náhodné; Opakovací cyklus; Východ/západ slnka; Iné
fr: Modes de fonctionnement de la minuterie: Comptage croissant; Compte à rebours; Intervalle; Commande manuelle; Monocoup (déclenchement unique); Programmes préréglés; Aléatoire; Cycle répétitif; Lever/coucher du soleil; Autre
hu: Időzítő működési típusa: Felfelé számolás; Visszaszámlálás; Intervallum; Kézi felülbírálás; Egyszeri (egyszeri indítás); Előre beállított programok; Véletlenszerű; Ismétlődő ciklus; Napkelte/napnyugta; Egyéb
it: Modalità operative del timer: Conteggio in avanti; Conto alla rovescia; Intervallo; Esclusione manuale; Singolo avvio (trigger singolo); Programmi preimpostati; Casuale; Ciclo ripetuto; Alba/tramonto; Altro
lt-LT: Laikmačio veikimo režimai: Skaičiavimas pirmyn; Atgalinis skaičiavimas; Intervalas; Rankinis valdymas; Vienkartinis (vienas paleidimas); Iš anksto nustatytos programos; Atsitiktinis; Ciklo kartojimas; Saulėtekis / saulėlydis; Kitas
zh-TW: 計時器操作模式: 正數; 倒數; 間歇; 手動覆寫; 單次 (單次觸發); 預設程式; 隨機; 重複循環; 日出/日落; 其他
cs: Provozní režimy časovače: Odpočítávání nahoru; Odpočítávání; Interval; Manuální přepsání; Jednorázový (jedno spuštění); Přednastavené programy; Náhodné; Opakování cyklu; Východ/západ slunce; Ostatní
sl-SI: Načini delovanja časovnika: Štetje naprej; Odštevanje; Intervalno; Ročna preglasitev; Enkratni zagon (en sprožilec); Vnaprej nastavljeni programi; Naključno; Ponavljajoč cikel; Sončni vzhod/zahod; Drugo
th: โหมดการทำงานของตัวจับเวลา: นับเดินหน้า; นับถอยหลัง; เป็นช่วงเวลา; ควบคุมด้วยตนเอง; ครั้งเดียว (ทริกเกอร์เดี่ยว); โปรแกรมที่ตั้งไว้ล่วงหน้า; สุ่ม; เล่นซ้ำ; พระอาทิตย์ขึ้น/พระอาทิตย์ตก; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Modos de funcionamento do temporizador: Contagem crescente; Contagem decrescente; Intervalo; Controlo manual; Um disparo (acionador único); Programas predefinidos; Aleatório; Repetir ciclo; Nascer do sol/pôr do sol; Outro
hr-HR: Načini rada timera: Odbrojavanje prema naprijed; Odbrojavanje; Interval; Ručno zaobilaženje; [Jednokratno (jedan okidač), Jednokratno (jedan okidač), Jednokratno (jedan okidač)]; Unaprijed postavljeni programi; Nasumično; Ciklus ponavljanja; Izlazak/zalazak sunca; Ostalo
vi: Các chế độ hoạt động của bộ hẹn giờ: Đếm tới; Đếm ngược; Ngắt quãng; Ghi đè thủ công; Một lần (kích hoạt duy nhất); Chương trình cài đặt sẵn; Ngẫu nhiên; Lặp lại chu kỳ; Bình minh/hoàng hôn; Khác
ru: Режимы работы таймера: Прямой отсчет; Обратный отсчет; Интервальный; Ручное управление; Одиночный (однократное срабатывание); Предустановленные программы; Случайный режим; Циклический; Восход/закат; Другое
el: Τρόποι λειτουργίας χρονομέτρου: Αύξουσα μέτρηση; Αντίστροφη μέτρηση; Διάλειμμα; Χειροκίνητη παράκαμψη; Εφάπαξ (ένα στοιχείο ενεργοποίησης); Προκαθορισμένα προγράμματα; Τυχαίο; Επαναλαμβανόμενος κύκλος; Ανατολή/δύση ηλίου; Άλλο
ro-RO: Moduri de funcționare a temporizatorului: Cronometrare crescătoare; Numărătoare inversă; Interval; Suprascriere manuală; O singură declanșare (one-shot); Programe presetate; Aleatoriu; Ciclu repetitiv; Răsărit/Apus; Altele